Wyoming statutes. Title 35 Public Health and Safety
Article 5. Solid Waste Management
§ 35-11-525.
Orphan landfill sites.

The director may expend funds contained within the account for remediation of orphan landfill sites and the performance of any other activity as defined in this article.

As used in this section, “orphan landfill site” means:

A landfill where the department determines:

There is no viable party responsible for causing or contributing to the landfill site; and

The landfill site is not the result of activities conducted on the site after September 13, 1989.

A landfill site, where the department determines that the person responsible for the landfill cannot be identified;

A landfill site where the department must take prompt action to prevent hazards to human health or the environment where a responsible party fails to act promptly.

To the extent funds are available, the department may expend funds from the account to conduct orphan landfill site evaluations and testing, evaluate remedial measures, select remediation requirements and construct, install, maintain and operate systems to remedy contamination in accordance with a remediation work plan prescribed by the director for the orphan landfill site.

Revenue to the account shall include any monies which may be deposited in the account for use in identification, characterization, prioritization, remediation and monitoring of orphan landfill sites. The liability of the state to fulfill the requirements of this section is limited to the amount of funds available in the account.

The department shall provide a report to the joint appropriations interim committee and the joint minerals, business and economic development interim committee. The report shall be included in the report required under W.S. 35-11-524(d) and shall include:

The work completed on the identification, characterization, prioritization, remediation and monitoring of orphan landfill sites within the state;

The estimated funding need for the identification, characterization, prioritization, remediation and monitoring of orphan landfill sites within the state for:

The next year or the next biennium, as applicable; and

The next ten (10) years.

In any case under paragraph (b)(iii) of this section where the department expends funds to remediate or contain contamination resulting from a landfill, and where the department has identified a responsible party, the responsible party shall reimburse the department in an amount equal to two (2) times the expenditure from the account. The attorney general shall bring suit to recover the reimbursement amount required in this subsection where recovery is deemed possible.

For purposes of this section, “account” means the account created under W.S. 35-11-515(a).

History.

Laws 2011, ch. 110, § 1.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2011, ch. 110, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 2, 2011

§ 35-11-526.
Performance based design and performance based evaluation in consideration and approval of engineered containment systems as part of municipal solid waste landfill permits.

A person submitting an application for a permit pursuant to W.S.

35-11-502

which contains a performance based design for a municipal solid waste landfill that does not incorporate an engineered containment system utilizing a composite liner and leachate collection system, shall submit a report with the application. The report shall contain the applicant’s findings as to the proposed performance based design’s compliance with applicable state and federal laws and regulations. The report shall contain scientific and engineering data supporting the implementation of the proposed design.

In reviewing scientific and engineering data related to a permit application and report containing a performance based design which does not incorporate an engineered containment system utilizing a composite liner and leachate collection system, the administrator shall prepare a detailed performance evaluation based on applied scientific and engineering data that adheres to W.S.

35-11-527

. The administrator shall determine in the performance evaluation whether to validate or invalidate the performance based design or an alternative performance based standard for landfill design contained in the permit application. The administrator shall base the performance based evaluation on acceptable applied scientific and engineering data and an analysis of that data using statistical procedures, including statistical power, when applicable.

The applicant or other interested party may appeal the administrator’s determination contained in a performance based evaluation of a permit pursuant to W.S.

35-11-502

. If the council determines that the performance based evaluation does not accurately or adequately identify and evaluate all the data and criteria required under this section and W.S.

35-11-527

, the council shall direct the administrator to reevaluate his determination. A decision by the council that the performance based evaluation is accurate and adequate shall be a final decision of the agency pursuant to the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act.

History.

Laws 2011, ch. 147, § 1.

Editor's note. —

Laws 2011, ch. 147, § 1, enacted this section as §

35-11-523

. It has been redesignated as §

35-11-526

at the direction of the Legislative Service Office.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2011, ch. 147, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const.
Approved March 3, 2011.

§ 35-11-527.
Performance based design evaluation criteria for municipal solid waste landfill units.

New municipal solid waste landfill units and lateral expansions approved by the administrator under W.S.

35-11-502

and

35-11-526

shall be constructed:

In accordance with a performance based design approved by the administrator in a performance based evaluation pursuant to W.S.

35-11-526

. Any performance based design approved must ensure that the concentration values for pollutants listed in the National Primary Drinking Water Regulations, 40 C.F.R. Part 141, will not be exceeded in the uppermost aquifer at the relevant point of compliance as determined under subsection (c) of this section; or

With an engineered containment system that utilizes a composite liner and a leachate collection system that is designed and constructed to maintain less than a thirty (30) centimeter depth of leachate over the liner.

When approving a design that complies with paragraph (a)(i) of this section, in addition to the requirements of W.S.

35-11-526

the administrator shall consider other relevant factors, including, but not limited to:

The hydrogeologic characteristics of the facility and surrounding land;

The climatic factors of the area; and

The physical and chemical characteristics and volume of the leachate.

The relevant point of compliance specified by the administrator for the allowable concentration values for pollutants under paragraph (a)(i) of this section shall be no more than one hundred fifty (150) meters from the waste management unit boundary and shall be located on land owned by the owner of the municipal solid waste landfill. In determining the relevant point of compliance, the administrator shall consider at least the following factors:

The hydrogeologic characteristics of the facility and surrounding land;

The physical and chemical characteristics and volume of the leachate;

The quantity, quality and direction of flow of ground water in the area;

The proximity and withdrawal rate of ground water users;

The availability of alternative sources of drinking water supplies;

The existing quality of the ground water, including other sources of contamination and their cumulative impacts on the ground water and whether the ground water is currently used or reasonably expected to be used for drinking water;

Public health, safety and welfare effects; and

Practicable capability of the owner or operator.

History.

Laws 2011, ch. 147, § 1.

Editor's note. —

Laws 2011, ch. 147, § 1, enacted this section as §

35-11-524

. It has been redesignated as §

35-11-527

at the direction of the Legislative Service Office.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2011, ch. 147, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const.
Approved March 3, 2011.

§ 35-11-528.
Municipal solid waste facilities cease and transfer program created; criteria for grants and loans; loan terms; availability of other state funding sources.

There is created the municipal solid waste facilities cease and transfer program. Grants and loans under the program shall be awarded by the state loan and investment board. The program shall be administered by the solid and hazardous waste division of the department of environmental quality with the input of the waste and water advisory board as provided in W.S.

35-11-528

through

35-11-531

.

Grants and loans shall be made from the municipal solid waste facilities cease and transfer accounts for all cease and transfer activities as provided in this section and by rule and regulation of the board. Grants and loans shall be made for:

Capping of a closed landfill;

Other closure related expenses including engineering, geological and other professional services;

Construction or acquisition of appropriate solid waste transfer facilities and equipment, including acquisition of real property.

Total costs of cease and transfer activities for a municipal solid waste facility shall be determined by the department in consultation with the local municipal solid waste facility operator. Grants shall be awarded in an amount determined by the state loan and investment board after consultation with the department and pursuant to the criteria contained in subsection (d) of this section. A municipal solid waste facility which is ceasing operations shall be eligible to receive loans for the costs of cease and transfer activities not funded by a grant pursuant to subsection (e) of this section.

Except as provided in subsection (h) of this section, grants and loans for cease and transfer activities shall be awarded in an amount determined by the state loan and investment board not to exceed seventy-five percent (75%) of the total cost of all cease and transfer activities of the municipal solid waste facility. The state loan and investment board shall base its determination of the percentage of grants and loans awarded for cease and transfer projects under the program on an equitable distribution of available funds among eligible municipal solid waste landfills and rules and regulations adopted pursuant to W.S.

35-11-530

. To be eligible for funding under the program the following criteria shall be met:

The local operator enters into a written agreement with the department to meet all regulatory obligations under the program;

The local operator implements and revises the community’s solid waste management plan as necessary to comply with all regulatory obligations;

The local operator ceases disposal of all municipal solid waste streams at the closed municipal solid waste facility;

The local operator conforms to the requirements of W.S.

35-11-532

;

The local operator:

Ceases disposal into units and facilities regulated under this article which do not have engineered containment systems or do not conform to performance based design standards; or

Obtains department approval, that shall include a time period determined appropriate by the department for operation, to:

Transfer and dispose municipal solid waste into permitted units and facilities regulated by the department which do not have engineered containment systems or do not conform to performance based design standards, for the purpose of closing the facility that is transferring municipal solid waste; and

Increase the rate at which municipal solid waste is accepted for disposal into permitted units and facilities regulated by the department which do not have engineered containment systems or do not conform to performance based design standards, for the purpose of promoting the early closure of the receiving facility or facilities. If the department grants approval under this subparagraph the receiving facility shall not be allowed to enlarge or extend the life of its facility except in furtherance of becoming a facility with an engineered containment system or conforming to performance based design standards.

Loans may be made under the program at zero interest rate, up to an annual interest rate equal to the average prime interest rate as determined in accordance with this subsection. Loans provided under the program shall be adequately collateralized as determined by the state loan and investment board. Principal and interest payments shall be deposited in the budget reserve account. The state loan and investment board shall establish interest rates to be charged for loans under the program, but the interest rate shall not exceed an annual interest rate equal to the average prime interest rate as determined by the state treasurer. To determine the average prime interest rate, the state treasurer shall average the prime interest rate for at least seventy-five percent (75%) of the thirty (30) largest banks in the United States. The interest rate shall be adjusted on January 1 of each year. Interest rates shall be established in recognition of the repayment abilities and needs of the local municipal solid waste facility operator eligible for loans under the program. The state loan and investment board shall establish loan amortization schedules, terms and conditions for each loan approved based on an applicant’s need, financial condition of the landfill operator or the entity responsible for solid waste funding, the projected life of the transfer facility and the ability of that entity to repay the loan in a timely manner.

Participation in the program shall not restrict funding for a municipal solid waste facility from any other program created or supported by the state.

Funds under the program shall not be expended on:

Salaries or benefits for employees of the municipal solid waste facility;

Long-term monitoring at a closed municipal solid waste facility or a closed cell of a still operating municipal solid waste facility;

Operational costs of municipal solid waste facilities.

Upon a showing that a local operator has exhausted all reasonably available funding sources, the director may recommend to the state loan and investment board funding in the form of grants and loans for up to one hundred percent (100%) of the total cost of cease and transfer activities of the municipal solid waste facility. In addition to the requirements contained in subsection (d) of this section, the state loan and investment board shall base its determination of a grant or loan award under this subsection on whether the local operator:

Has any additional funding sources reasonably available to allocate to project costs;

Is charging sufficient gate or use fees to fully fund the operational costs of transfer facilities constructed under the program.

History.

2013 ch. 194, § 1, effective March 13, 2013; 2014 ch. 52, § 1, effective March 10, 2014; 2016 ch. 27, § 1, effective March 3, 2016.

The 2014 amendment,

rewrote (d)(v) which formerly read: “The local operator ceases disposal into units and facilities regulated under this article which do not have engineered containment systems or do not conform to performance based design standards.”

Laws 2014, ch. 52, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. Approved March 10, 2014.

The 2016 amendment

inserted “Except as provided in subsection (h) of this section,” at the beginning of (d); and added (h).

Laws 2016, ch. 27 § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8 of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2016.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2013, ch. 194, § 2,
directs: “(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, there is
appropriated one million dollars ($1,000,000.00) from the funds appropriated
to the municipal solid waste landfill account by 2011 Wyoming Session
Laws, Chapter 88, Section 354, to the municipal solid waste facilities
cease and transfer grant account for the purposes of this act.

“(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, there is appropriated
five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000.00) from the funds appropriated
to the municipal solid waste landfill account by 2011 Wyoming Session
Laws, Chapter 88, Section 354, to the municipal solid waste facilities
cease and transfer loan account for the purposes of this act.

“(c) There is appropriated fifty thousand dollars ($50,000.00)
from the general fund to the office of state lands and investments
for the administration of the municipal solid waste landfill cease
and transfer program. Notwithstanding any other provision of law,
this appropriation shall not be transferred or expended for any other
purpose and any unexpended, unobligated funds remaining from this
appropriation shall revert as provided by law on June 30, 2014.

“(d) There is appropriated one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000.00)
from the general fund to the department of environmental quality to
fulfill the purposes of this act. Notwithstanding any other provision
of law, this appropriation shall not be transferred or expended for
any other purpose and any unexpended, unobligated funds remaining
from this appropriation shall revert as provided by law on June 30,
2014.”

Effective dates. —

Laws 2013, ch. 194, § 3 makes this act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. Approved March 13, 2013.

§ 35-11-529.
Municipal solid waste facilities cease and transfer accounts created; authorized expenditures from the accounts.

There is created the municipal solid waste cease and transfer grant account. Monies from the account shall be awarded for grants to fund approved activities pursuant to W.S.

35-11-528

. Interest earned by this account shall be deposited in the budget reserve account. Notwithstanding W.S.

9-2-1008

, 9-2-1012(e) and 9-4-207(a), funds deposited in this account shall not revert without further action of the legislature.

There is created the municipal solid waste cease and transfer loan account. Monies from the account shall be awarded for loans to fund approved activities pursuant to W.S.

35-11-528

. Interest earned by this account shall be deposited in the budget reserve account. Notwithstanding W.S.

9-2-1008

, 9-2-1012(e) and 9-4-207(a), funds deposited in this account shall not revert without further action of the legislature.

History.

2013 ch. 194, § 1, effective March 13, 2013.

§ 35-11-530.
Rules and regulations.

The state loan and investment board in consultation with the department of environmental quality shall promulgate rules and regulations necessary to administer the municipal solid waste facility cease and transfer program. Those rules shall include:

Criteria for eligibility under the program based on W.S. 35-11-528(d);

Specific cease and transfer activities which are eligible for funding under the program;

Application form and procedure under the program;

Criteria for grant and loan prioritization based on:

Funding availability;

Cost efficiencies achieved by allocation of resources;

Opportunities for increased cost sharing between cease and transfer actions at multiple leaking municipal solid waste facilities;

Timeliness of cease and transfer actions in reducing risk to public health, safety and welfare or the environment;

Remaining life of the existing municipal solid waste facility;

Whether the proposed actions are a cost-effective alternative in accordance with the integrated solid waste management plan approved for the municipal solid waste facility;

Whether the proposed action is reasonable and appropriate for the current and projected volumes of all solid waste for the area served by the facility;

Whether the proposal contains recycling and other forms of waste diversion as a component of the proposed facilities and management practices; and

The likelihood that the cease and transfer actions will reduce or eliminate the threat posed to public health, safety and welfare or the environment by continuing releases.

History.

2013 ch. 194, § 1, effective March 13, 2013.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) or subparagraph (a)(iv)(I) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 35-11-531.
General permit for cease and closure for small landfills; rulemaking authority.

The department shall develop a general permit in accordance with W.S. 35-11-801(d) for closing municipal solid waste landfills with a total surface area of less than thirty (30) acres, and shall provide assistance to municipalities in the general permitting process. The general permit shall comply with federal requirements for municipal solid waste landfill closure and post-closure.

The department shall provide assistance for permitting municipal solid waste transfer facility activities at closing municipal solid waste landfills with a total surface area of less than thirty (30) acres.

The department shall promulgate rules and regulations necessary to achieve the purposes of this section.

Repealed by Laws 2019, ch. 186, § 2.

History.

2013 ch. 194, § 1, effective March 13, 2013; 2019 ch. 186, § 2, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, repealed (d), which read: "The department shall report to the joint minerals, business and economic development interim committee on or before July 1, 2014 on the assistance provided under subsections (a) and (b) of this section."

§ 35-11-532.
Municipal solid waste facility operator financial responsibility; penalties.

Municipal solid waste facility operators shall ensure continued revenue or funding streams sufficient to provide for all foreseeable costs of the facility, including but not limited to the full costs of:

Operations;

Monitoring;

Recycling, composting and other diversion activities;

Closure; and

Post-closure activities.

On or before January 1, 2014 and at least once every four (4) years thereafter, municipal solid waste facility operators shall submit to the department written documentation demonstrating compliance with subsection (a) of this section.

Municipal solid waste facility operators shall employ accounting principles pursuant to the Uniform Municipal Fiscal Procedures Act, W.S.

16-4-101

through

16-4-125

, which recognize liabilities associated with:

Closure and post-closure costs; and

The long-term cost of waste disposal compared to recycling, composting or other diversion activities.

Compliance with this section shall be a prerequisite for eligibility for any state grant and loan program available to a municipal solid waste facility and state funding for solid waste landfill monitoring and remediation.

History.

2013 ch. 194, § 1, effective March 13, 2013; 2015 ch. 47, § 1, effective February 25, 2015.

The 2015 amendment,

rewrote the introductory language of (c).

Laws 2015, ch. 47, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 25, 2015.

§ 35-11-533.
Municipal solid waste landfill remediation program created; purpose.

There is created the municipal solid waste landfill remediation program. The program shall be administered by the solid and hazardous waste division of the department of environmental quality with the input of the waste and water advisory board as provided in W.S.

35-11-533

through

35-11-537

.

The legislature recognizes the threat to the public health, safety, welfare and the environment caused by pollution to soil and water from leaking municipal solid waste landfills. The purpose of this program is to take state primacy of the municipal solid waste landfill remediation program and to provide funding to take remediation actions at eligible leaking municipal solid waste landfills.

History.

2013 ch. 158, § 1, effective March 13, 2013.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2013, ch. 158, enacted this section as
§

35-11-528

.
The section is set out as subsequently renumbered by the legislative service office.

Laws 2013 ch. 158, § 3, directs:
“Monies appropriated to the municipal solid waste landfill account
by 2011 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 88, Section 354, and all other
monies deposited or designated for that account shall be deposited
in the municipal solid waste landfill remediation account created
by this section.”

§ 35-11-534.
Program criteria; requirements for local operator.

The department shall contract with entities, including contractors and local operators, to provide monitoring and remediation activities, including but not limited to groundwater remediation and monitoring, methane mitigation and monitoring and landfill capping, at eligible leaking municipal solid waste landfills. The department shall oversee and fund up to seventy-five percent (75%) of the cost of the investigation of contamination, the design and installation of monitoring and remediation systems and the operation and maintenance of monitoring and remediation systems for up to ten (10) years. The department may operate and maintain a system for a longer period of time in consideration of site specific circumstances. The period of time during which the department shall have responsibility for the monitoring and remediation activities at a leaking municipal solid waste landfill shall be communicated to the local operator prior to installation of the monitoring and remediation systems.

The department shall contract for monitoring and remediation activities under the program at leaking municipal solid waste landfills based upon the priority list of landfills developed pursuant to W.S.

35-11-524

and other factors as provided in W.S. 35-11-536(a)(iv). The department shall update the priority list of leaking landfills requiring monitoring and remediation activities periodically as conditions warrant and may consider all relevant factors when developing and updating the priority list.

To be eligible for enrollment under the program, the local operators of a leaking municipal solid waste landfill shall:

Enter into a written agreement with the department to meet all regulatory obligations under the program;

Implement and revise the community’s solid waste management plan as necessary to comply with all regulatory obligations;

Cease disposal of all waste streams at a leaking closed facility or the leaking portion of an operating facility which is undergoing remediation activities pursuant to department rules and regulations and the written agreement between the department and the local operator;

Cease disposal into units and facilities regulated under this article which do not have engineered containment systems or do not conform to performance based design standards;

Agree to provide funding from any available funding source for at least twenty-five percent (25%) of the total costs of monitoring and remediation under the program;

Control the source of releases of pollution so as to reduce or eliminate further releases from the leaking municipal solid waste landfill;

Ensure continued revenue or funding streams sufficient to provide for all foreseeable costs of solid waste facilities under the control of the local operator or political subdivision, including but not limited to the full costs of:

Operations;

Monitoring;

Recycling, composting and other diversion activities;

Closure; and

Post-closure activities.

Employ accounting principles in managing all solid waste facilities under the control of the local operator or political subdivision, pursuant to the Uniform Municipal Fiscal Procedures Act, W.S.

16-4-101

through

16-4-125

, which recognize liabilities associated with:

Closure and post-closure costs; and

The long-term cost of waste disposal compared to recycling, composting or other diversion activities.

In carrying out monitoring and remediation activities under the program the department has the right to construct and maintain any structure, monitor well, recovery system or any other reasonable and necessary item associated with taking remediation and monitoring actions.

The department shall notify the affected public of all confirmed releases requiring a plan for remediation, and upon request, provide or make available to the interested public information concerning the nature of the release and the remediation actions planned or taken.

The department shall delegate and authorize a local operator to conduct or oversee monitoring and remediation under the program pursuant to a written agreement between the department and the local operator acknowledging that the local operator shall adhere to all regulatory requirements of the program in conducting monitoring and remediation activities. The department shall approve the local operator’s monitoring and remediation plan prior to authorizing the local operator to conduct or oversee the monitoring and remediation program. The department shall take all actions necessary to ensure that a local operator granted authority to conduct or oversee monitoring and remediation activities under this subsection complies with all regulatory requirements of the program.

History.

2013 ch. 158, § 1, effective March 13, 2013; 2015 ch. 47, § 1, effective February 25, 2015.

The 2015 amendment,

rewrote the introductory language of (c)(viii), which formerly read: “Employ generally accepted accounting principles in managing all solid waste facilities under the control of the local operator or political subdivision, including the recognition of liabilities associated with.”

Laws 2015, ch. 47, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 25, 2015.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2013, ch. 158, enacted this section as
§

35-11-529

.
The section is set out as subsequently renumbered by the legislative service office.

§ 35-11-535.
Municipal solid waste landfill remediation account; authorized expenditures from the account.

There is created the municipal solid waste landfill remediation account. The department shall use monies from the municipal solid waste landfill remediation account as appropriated by the legislature for the administration of the program. Interest earned by this account shall be deposited in the general fund. Notwithstanding W.S.

9-2-1008

, 9-2-1012(e) and 9-4-207(a), funds deposited in this account shall not revert without further action of the legislature.

For a leaking municipal solid waste landfill to be eligible for use of monies in the account, the owner or operator of the site shall comply with all requirements of the program and regulations of the council adopted pursuant to W.S.

35-11-536

.

In addition to expenditures from the account authorized by W.S. 35-11-534(a), the department shall issue a credit in an amount not to exceed the local operator’s twenty-five percent (25%) share required by W.S. 35-11-534(c)(v) of the total cost of eligible remediation and monitoring activities provided in W.S. 35-11-534(a), for past remediation and monitoring expenses incurred by the local operator as specified in this subsection. The department shall issue credits under this subsection for costs incurred by a local operator for remediation and monitoring activities from the account if:

A work plan for the remediation and monitoring activities was submitted to and approved by the department;

The remediation and monitoring activities were initiated after July 1, 2006;

The local operator of a municipal solid waste landfill provides the department with an accurate accounting of the costs of remediation and monitoring activities conducted at the municipal solid waste landfill after July 1, 2006 and the department determines that those remediation and monitoring activities would be eligible for funding if they had been performed under the program;

The local operator conducts additional remediation and monitoring activities at the leaking municipal solid waste landfill which are eligible for funding under W.S. 35-11-534(a) on or after July 1, 2013; and

A credit issued under this subsection shall not exceed an amount equal to seventy-five percent (75%) of the cost incurred by the local operator for eligible remediation and monitoring activities after July 1, 2006.

Repealed by Laws 2015, ch. 47 § 2.

History.

2013 ch. 158, § 1, effective March 13, 2013; 2015 ch. 47, §§
1, 2, effective February 25, 2015.

The 2015 amendment,

rewrote the introductory language of (c), which formerly read: “Pursuant to subsection (d) of this section, in addition to expenditures from the account authorized by W.S. 35-11-534(a), the department shall reimburse costs incurred by a local operator who performed remediation and monitoring activities from the account if”’; substituted “initiated after July 1, 2006” for “initiated between after July 1, 2006 and December 31, 2012”; rewrote (c)(iii); added (c)(v); repealed (d), pertaining to authorized reimbursements; and made related changes.

Laws 2015, ch. 47, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 25, 2015.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2013, ch. 158, enacted this section as
§

35-11-530

.
The section is set out as subsequently renumbered by the legislative service office.

§ 35-11-536.
Rules and regulations.

The council shall promulgate rules and regulations necessary to administer the program after recommendation from the director of the department, the administrator of the solid and hazardous waste division and the water and waste advisory board. The rules shall include but shall not be limited to rules and regulations which:

Provide for landfill monitoring and remediation system design, construction, installation and monitoring standards which shall be no less stringent than federal requirements;

Specify the requirements for delegating installation or modification inspection authority including but not limited to requirements for contractors and local operators;

Establish a procedure or procedures for reporting any release from a municipal solid waste landfill;

Include provisions under which priorities for remediation actions shall be established in addition to the priority list created pursuant to W.S.

35-11-524

. Those priorities shall be established considering, but not limited to, the following factors:

Funding availability;

Cost efficiencies achieved by allocation of resources;

Opportunities for increased cost sharing between monitoring and remediation actions at multiple leaking municipal solid waste landfills;

Timeliness of remediation in reducing risk to public health, safety and welfare or the environment;

The likelihood that the remedy will reduce or eliminate the threat posed to public health, safety and welfare or the environment by continuing releases; and

Whether the facility has completed closure and transfer actions at the leaking municipal solid waste facility. Priority shall be given to solid waste facilities which have completed closure and transfer actions.

Require records for compliance with repairs and upgrades to be maintained for the operational life of the landfill remediation and monitoring system;

Create requirements for participation in the program and for the return of the facility to local control pursuant to W.S. 35-11-534(a); and

Specify standards for restoration of the environment.

History.

2013 ch. 158, § 1, effective March 13, 2013.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2013, ch. 158, enacted this section as
§

35-11-531

.
The section is set out as subsequently renumbered by the legislative service office.

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 35-11-537.
Restoration standard.

Any owner or operator, the department or other person taking a corrective action shall restore the environment to a condition and quality consistent with standards established in rules and regulations.

History.

2013 ch. 158, § 1, effective March 13, 2013.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2013, ch. 158, enacted this section as
§

35-11-532

.
The section is set out as subsequently renumbered by the legislative service office.